Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Sale of War Bonds

39.300.
Authorization of issuing agents for United States obligations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, all individuals, partnerships, associations or corporations organized, operating, or doing business under the laws of this state are hereby authorized, during the continuance of any emergency proclaimed by the President of the United States or of a state of war between the United States and a foreign nation or nations, and for such time thereafter as may be expedient or necessary, and upon designation by and qualification with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or under his authority, to act as issuing agents for the sale and issue of obligations of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 117, § 1.